Hawaii statutes.
§226‑107 Quality education.
Priority guidelines to promote quality education:

(1) Pursue effective programs which reflect the
varied district, school, and student needs to strengthen basic skills
achievement;

(2) Continue emphasis on general education
"core" requirements to provide common background to students and
essential support to other university programs;

(3) Initiate efforts to improve the quality of
education by improving the capabilities of the education work force;

(4) Promote increased opportunities for greater
autonomy and flexibility of educational institutions in their decisionmaking
responsibilities;

(5) Increase and improve the use of information
technology in education by the availability of telecommunications equipment
for:

(A) The electronic exchange of information;

(B) Statewide electronic mail; and

(C) Access to the Internet.

Encourage programs that increase the public's
awareness and understanding of the impact of information technologies on our
lives;

(6) Pursue the establishment of Hawaii's public and
private universities and colleges as research and training centers of the
Pacific;

(7) Develop resources and programs for early
childhood education;

(8) Explore alternatives for funding and delivery of
educational services to improve the overall quality of education; and

(9) Strengthen and expand educational programs and
services for students with special needs. [L 1986, c 276, §34; am L 1999, c
178, §18]

Cross References

E-mail accounts for
students, see §302A-446.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next